North Dakota, session 69, HB1157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 8 of section 16.1-08.1-02.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
8. To ensure accurate reporting and avoid commingling of campaign and personal funds,
candidates shall use dedicated non - interest-bearing campaign accounts that are
separate from any personal accounts.
Page No. 1 25.0420.01000